Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4021.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of health services; registry identification cards; veterans; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services for the issuance and renewal of registry identification cards for veterans of the United States armed forces pursuant to section 36-2804.02, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.